New York, session 2025-2026, A5797.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 378 of the executive law is amended by adding two 2 new subdivisions 5-e and 5-f to read as follows: 3 5-e. Standards for installation of automatic sprinkler systems requir- 4 ing that the owner of every multi-family dwelling with a height over two 5 stories, regardless of age or historic designation of the dwelling, 6 shall have installed in such dwelling an automatic fire suppression 7 system on each floor level of such dwelling in which people reside. 8 5-f. Standards for installation of emergency fire escapes requiring 9 that the owner of every multi-family dwelling with a height over two 10 stories, regardless of the age or historic designation of the dwelling, 11 shall have installed in such dwelling an emergency fire escape on each 12 floor level of such dwelling, excluding the first floor level. For the 13 purposes of this subdivision, the term "emergency fire escape" may 14 include an exterior stairway, a standard fire escape, a roll out emer- 15 gency ladder, or any other apparatus the council deems appropriate. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04403-01-5